Utah statutes.
59-7-401.   Determining threshold level of business activity for corporations organized or incorporated outside of the United States.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), in determining whether a corporation is a foreign operating company or has met the threshold level of business activity, business activity within and without the United States shall be measured by means of the factors ordinarily applicable under Sections 59-7-312 through 59-7-319.

(2) (a)  Any taxpayer who would ordinarily be required to apportion business income in accordance with Part 3, Allocation and Apportionment of Income - Utah UDITPA Provisions, shall use a two-factor formula of property and payroll.

(b)  The results of the property and payroll factor computation shall be divided by two, or by one if either the property or payroll factor has a denominator of zero.



Amended by Chapter 225, 2005 General Session

